North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 5B. School Administrator Training Programs.

§ 116-74.21.
Establishment of a competitive proposal process for school administrator programs.

The Board of Governors shall develop and implement a competitive proposal process and criteria for assessing proposals to establish school administrator training programs within the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina. To facilitate the development of the programs, program criteria, and the proposal process, the Board of Governors may convene a panel of national school administrator program experts and other professional training program experts to assist it in designing the program, the proposal process, and criteria for assessing the proposals.

No more than 12 school administrator programs shall be established under the competitive proposal program. In selecting campus sites, the Board of Governors shall be sensitive to the racial, cultural, and geographic diversity of the State. Special priority shall be given to the following factors: (i) the historical background of the institutions in training educators; (ii) the ability of the sites to serve the geographic regions of the State, such as, the far west, the west, the triad, the piedmont, and the east; and, (iii) whether the type of roads and terrain in a region make commuting difficult. A school administrator program may provide for instruction at one or more campus sites.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-80, s. 2.4(a), effective July 8, 2021.

The Board of Governors shall develop a budget for the programs established under subsection (a) of this section that reflects the resources necessary to establish and operate school administrator programs that meet the vision of the report submitted to the 1993 General Assembly by the Educational Leadership Task Force.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 9.23, effective July 1, 2005.

History.

1993, c. 199, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 677, s. 13; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.2(a); 1998-212, s. 11.13(a); 2001-424, s. 31.10(a); 2005-276, s. 9.23; 2010-31, s. 9.3(b); 2021-80, s. 2.4(a).

§§ 116-74.22 through 116-74.40.

Reserved for future codification purposes.